assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.aff
SFX S Y 32
SFX S 0 s [acefgikoptuw]
SFX S 0 es [bdhjlmry]
SFX S  aes
SFX S 0 es [^e]n
SFX S 0 es [^]s
SFX S n anes n
SFX S n enes n
SFX S n ines n
SFX S n ones n
SFX S n unes n
SFX S s ases s
SFX S s eses s
SFX S s ises s
SFX S s oses s
SFX S s uses s
SFX S 0 es [^dgmv]en
SFX S orden rdenes orden
SFX S agen genes agen
SFX S argen rgenes argen
SFX S igen genes igen
SFX S irgen rgenes irgen
SFX S amen menes amen
SFX S armen rmenes armen
SFX S emen menes emen
SFX S ermen rmenes ermen
SFX S imen menes imen
SFX S omen menes omen
SFX S olmen lmenes olmen
SFX S umen menes umen
SFX S ulmen lmenes ulmen
SFX S oven venes oven
SFX S z ces z

SFX  Y 4
SFX  0 la r
SFX  0 lo r
SFX  0 las r
SFX  0 los r

SFX  Y 4
SFX  0 me r
SFX  0 te r
SFX  0 nos r
SFX  0 os r

SFX  Y 2
SFX  0 le r
SFX  0 les r

SFX  Y 80
SFX  ar rmela ar
SFX  ar rmelo ar
SFX  ar rmelas ar
SFX  ar rmelos ar
SFX  ar rtela ar
SFX  ar rtelo ar
SFX  ar rtelas ar
SFX  ar rtelos ar
SFX  ar rsela ar
SFX  ar rselo ar
SFX  ar rselas ar
SFX  ar rselos ar
SFX  ar rnosla ar
SFX  ar rnoslo ar
SFX  ar rnoslas ar
SFX  ar rnoslos ar
SFX  ar rosla ar
SFX  ar roslo ar
SFX  ar roslas ar
SFX  ar roslos ar
SFX  er rmela er
SFX  er rmelo er
SFX  er rmelas er
SFX  er rmelos er
SFX  er rtela er
SFX  er rtelo er
SFX  er rtelas er
SFX  er rtelos er
SFX  er rsela er
SFX  er rselo er
SFX  er rselas er
SFX  er rselos er
SFX  er rnosla er
SFX  er rnoslo er
SFX  er rnoslas er
SFX  er rnoslos er
SFX  er rosla er
SFX  er roslo er
SFX  er roslas er
SFX  er roslos er
SFX  ir rmela ir
SFX  ir rmelo ir
SFX  ir rmelas ir
SFX  ir rmelos ir
SFX  ir rtela ir
SFX  ir rtelo ir
SFX  ir rtelas ir
SFX  ir rtelos ir
SFX  ir rsela ir
SFX  ir rselo ir
SFX  ir rselas ir
SFX  ir rselos ir
SFX  ir rnosla ir
SFX  ir rnoslo ir
SFX  ir rnoslas ir
SFX  ir rnoslos ir
SFX  ir rosla ir
SFX  ir roslo ir
SFX  ir roslas ir
SFX  ir roslos ir
SFX  0 mela r
SFX  0 melo r
SFX  0 melas r
SFX  0 melos r
SFX  0 tela r
SFX  0 telo r
SFX  0 telas r
SFX  0 telos r
SFX  0 sela r
SFX  0 selo r
SFX  0 selas r
SFX  0 selos r
SFX  0 nosla r
SFX  0 noslo r
SFX  0 noslas r
SFX  0 noslos r
SFX  0 osla r
SFX  0 oslo r
SFX  0 oslas r
SFX  0 oslos r

SFX  Y 16
SFX  ar ndola ar
SFX  ar ndolo ar
SFX  ar ndolas ar
SFX  ar ndolos ar
SFX  er indola [^aeo]er
SFX  er indolo [^aeo]er
SFX  er indolas [^aeo]er
SFX  er indolos [^aeo]er
SFX  er yndola [aeo]er
SFX  er yndolo [aeo]er
SFX  er yndolas [aeo]er
SFX  er yndolos [aeo]er
SFX  r ndola ir
SFX  r ndolo ir
SFX  r ndolas ir
SFX  r ndolos ir

SFX  Y 16
SFX  ar ndome ar
SFX  ar ndote ar
SFX  ar ndonos ar
SFX  ar ndoos ar
SFX  er indome [^aeo]er
SFX  er indote [^aeo]er
SFX  er indonos [^aeo]er
SFX  er indoos [^aeo]er
SFX  er yndome [aeo]er
SFX  er yndote [aeo]er
SFX  er yndonos [aeo]er
SFX  er yndoos [aeo]er
SFX  r ndome ir
SFX  r ndote ir
SFX  r ndonos ir
SFX  r ndoos ir

SFX  Y 8
SFX  ar ndole ar
SFX  ar ndoles ar
SFX  er indole [^aeo]er
SFX  er indoles [^aeo]er
SFX  er yndole [aeo]er
SFX  er yndoles [aeo]er
SFX  r ndole ir
SFX  r ndoles ir

SFX  Y 60
SFX  ar ndomela ar
SFX  ar ndomelo ar
SFX  ar ndomelas ar
SFX  ar ndomelos ar
SFX  ar ndotela ar
SFX  ar ndotelo ar
SFX  ar ndotelas ar
SFX  ar ndotelos ar
SFX  ar ndosela ar
SFX  ar ndoselo ar
SFX  ar ndoselas ar
SFX  ar ndoselos ar
SFX  ar ndonosla ar
SFX  ar ndonoslo ar
SFX  ar ndonoslas ar
SFX  ar ndonoslos ar
SFX  ar ndoosla ar
SFX  ar ndooslo ar
SFX  ar ndooslas ar
SFX  ar ndooslos ar
SFX  er indomela er
SFX  er indomelo er
SFX  er indomelas er
SFX  er indomelos er
SFX  er indotela er
SFX  er indotelo er
SFX  er indotelas er
SFX  er indotelos er
SFX  er indosela er
SFX  er indoselo er
SFX  er indoselas er
SFX  er indoselos er
SFX  er indonosla er
SFX  er indonoslo er
SFX  er indonoslas er
SFX  er indonoslos er
SFX  er indoosla er
SFX  er indooslo er
SFX  er indooslas er
SFX  er indooslos er
SFX  r ndomela ir
SFX  r ndomelo ir
SFX  r ndomelas ir
SFX  r ndomelos ir
SFX  r ndotela ir
SFX  r ndotelo ir
SFX  r ndotelas ir
SFX  r ndotelos ir
SFX  r ndosela ir
SFX  r ndoselo ir
SFX  r ndoselas ir
SFX  r ndoselos ir
SFX  r ndonosla ir
SFX  r ndonoslo ir
SFX  r ndonoslas ir
SFX  r ndonoslos ir
SFX  r ndoosla ir
SFX  r ndooslo ir
SFX  r ndooslas ir
SFX  r ndooslos ir

SFX  Y 76
SFX  er indola er
SFX  er indolo er
SFX  er indolas er
SFX  er indolos er
SFX  erir irindola erir
SFX  erir irindolo erir
SFX  erir irindolas erir
SFX  erir irindolos erir
SFX  ertir irtindola ertir
SFX  ertir irtindolo ertir
SFX  ertir irtindolas ertir
SFX  ertir irtindolos ertir
SFX  entir intindola entir
SFX  entir intindolo entir
SFX  entir intindolas entir
SFX  entir intindolos entir
SFX  ervir irvindola ervir
SFX  ervir irvindolo ervir
SFX  ervir irvindolas ervir
SFX  ervir irvindolos ervir
SFX  enir inindola enir
SFX  enir inindolo enir
SFX  enir inindolas enir
SFX  enir inindolos enir
SFX  ir yndola [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndolo [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndolas [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndolos [^g]uir
SFX  eir indola eir
SFX  eir indolo eir
SFX  eir indolas eir
SFX  eir indolos eir
SFX  egir igindola egir
SFX  egir igindolo egir
SFX  egir igindolas egir
SFX  egir igindolos egir
SFX  edir idindola edir
SFX  edir idindolo edir
SFX  edir idindolas edir
SFX  edir idindolos edir
SFX  etir itindola etir
SFX  etir itindolo etir
SFX  etir itindolas etir
SFX  etir itindolos etir
SFX  ebir ibindola ebir
SFX  ebir ibindolo ebir
SFX  ebir ibindolas ebir
SFX  ebir ibindolos ebir
SFX  emir imindola emir
SFX  emir imindolo emir
SFX  emir imindolas emir
SFX  emir imindolos emir
SFX  eguir iguindola eguir
SFX  eguir iguindolo eguir
SFX  eguir iguindolas eguir
SFX  eguir iguindolos eguir
SFX  estir istindola estir
SFX  estir istindolo estir
SFX  estir istindolas estir
SFX  estir istindolos estir
SFX  ecir icindola ecir
SFX  ecir icindolo ecir
SFX  ecir icindolas ecir
SFX  ecir icindolos ecir
SFX  er indola er
SFX  er indolo er
SFX  er indolas er
SFX  er indolos er
SFX  r yndola or
SFX  r yndolo or
SFX  r yndolas or
SFX  r yndolos or
SFX  r ndola ucir
SFX  r ndolo ucir
SFX  r ndolas ucir
SFX  r ndolos ucir

SFX  Y 60
SFX  er indome [^a]er
SFX  er indote [^a]er
SFX  er indonos [^a]er
SFX  er indoos [^a]er
SFX  er yndome aer
SFX  er yndote aer
SFX  er yndonos aer
SFX  er yndoos aer
SFX  erir irindome erir
SFX  erir irindote erir
SFX  erir irindonos erir
SFX  erir irindoos erir
SFX  ertir irtindome ertir
SFX  ertir irtindote ertir
SFX  ertir irtindonos ertir
SFX  ertir irtindoos ertir
SFX  ervir irvindome ervir
SFX  ervir irvindote ervir
SFX  ervir irvindonos ervir
SFX  ervir irvindoos ervir
SFX  ormir urmindome ormir
SFX  ormir urmindote ormir
SFX  ormir urmindonos ormir
SFX  ormir urmindoos ormir
SFX  ir yndome [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndote [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndonos [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndoos [^g]uir
SFX  edir idindome edir
SFX  edir idindote edir
SFX  edir idindonos edir
SFX  edir idindoos edir
SFX  etir itindome etir
SFX  etir itindote etir
SFX  etir itindonos etir
SFX  etir itindoos etir
SFX  eguir iguindome eguir
SFX  eguir iguindote eguir
SFX  eguir iguindonos eguir
SFX  eguir iguindoos eguir
SFX  estir istindome estir
SFX  estir istindote estir
SFX  estir istindonos estir
SFX  estir istindoos estir
SFX  ecir icindome ecir
SFX  ecir icindote ecir
SFX  ecir icindonos ecir
SFX  ecir icindoos ecir
SFX  er indome er
SFX  er indote er
SFX  er indonos er
SFX  er indoos er
SFX  r yndome or
SFX  r yndote or
SFX  r yndonos or
SFX  r yndoos or
SFX  r ndome ucir
SFX  r ndote ucir
SFX  r ndonos ucir
SFX  r ndoos ucir

SFX  Y 38
SFX  er indole [^a]er
SFX  er indoles [^a]er
SFX  er yndole aer
SFX  er yndoles aer
SFX  erir irindole erir
SFX  erir irindoles erir
SFX  ertir irtindole ertir
SFX  ertir irtindoles ertir
SFX  entir intindole entir
SFX  entir intindoles entir
SFX  endir indindole endir
SFX  endir indindoles endir
SFX  ervir irvindole ervir
SFX  ervir irvindoles ervir
SFX  enir inindole enir
SFX  enir inindoles enir
SFX  ir yndole [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndoles [^g]uir
SFX  eir indole eir
SFX  eir indoles eir
SFX  egir igindole egir
SFX  egir igindoles egir
