assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.dic
aborrece/S
abunden/rt
abusador/GS
acmila/S
acompaarlo/S
acuite/S
adopcionismo/S
afanoso/GS
agilice/S
aguad/rhi
aguamala/S
aguda/r
ag/irh
age/rSih
ajee/S
albanega/S
alcaravanero/S
alc/rp
alfaneque/S
aligare/fGS
alimentbamos/r
alimentad/rG
alimentan/r
alimentaran/r
alimentars/r
alimentremos/r
alimentarais/r
alimentaron/r
alimentasen/r
alimentaste/r
alimente/rGS
almizcleo/GS
alterno/sS
alzan/rp
alzo/rpG
amasio/GS
amortece/S
ancoraje/S
anguilero/SG
antlope/S
aade/rGS
aad/r
apaciguador/GS
apimpolle/GS
apretndotelo/SG
aran/trp
arbitrario/SGK
arcos/r
argumento/S
ar/pr
arrastrante/S
arroto/GS
asar/rRD
asenso/S
as/r
astado/GsSi
aterece/S
aturde/SGh
avecinde/GhS
azamboo/S
baenero/GS
ballesta/aSi
baraste/GS
barred/r
barrern/r
barreremos/r
barreran/r
barretee/SG
barrais/r
barrido/rGS
barriramos/r
barriremos/r
barrieseis/r
barrimos/r
barriste/r
batimiento/S
bebe/GSirh
bebi/hri
bemol/S
bienmandado/SG
blanquece/Si
bolar/Si
bornee/GS
braguetero/GS
bronquedad/S
burdel/S
cabizbajo/GS
cagachn/S
calentndolo/S
calza/rhSp
camarico/S
canadiense/S
cantado/iSgh
capiller/S
cargabais/rh
cargado/hSpr
cargndose/r
cargramos/r
cargars/rph
cargaremos/r
cargarais/r
cargarla/hr
cargase/hpr
cargas/hSpr
cargu/hrpi
carlita/S
caros/rh
catafalco/S
celia/S
cenad/r
cene/GSr
cen/r
cerviz/S
chinela/S
cielo/rS
cmbrico/GS
clinopodio/S
cogemos/irbjh
cogeris/brj
cogerais/rjb
cogerme/ri
coga/brSjihap
cogida/ihbjr
cogiramos/jr
cogiremos/rj
cogiesen/bjr
cogisteis/brj
cojan/bprajhi
clera/S
compartidor/GS
conducente/Sk
constriccin/S
contumelia/S
corriente/FS
creced/hpgar
crecen/hpgar
creceris/r
creceramos/r
crecais/r
crecida/r
crecierais/r
creciereis/r
crecieron/r
crec/hagpr
creciste/r
cretona/S
crezcan/r
cubrindolo/S
cuello/Shr
curar/rRopDE
curo/opr
damnificador/SG
dendriforme/S
desentono/S
destrozador/SG
difumine/SG
disimulador/GS
dompedro/S
doraba/hSrp
dorad/hGpra
dorando/hrp
dorar/hpr
dorarn/prh
dorare/hSGrp
dorremos/r
doraran/rh
doraseis/rh
doraste/hrp
doren/prah
dor/rhap
echrtelo/GS
el/S
empecedero/SG
enciclopdico/SG
engarnio/S
ensayador/GS
entendi/tsrh
epigramatista/S
escarbador/GS
escurrindolo/S
espirativo/GS
estril/S
tico/SG
excedan/r
exceder/RrED
exced/r
excita/r
excite/rGS
explicite/GS
famlico/GS
faz/crhSl
ficcin/S
florista/LS
franqueo/S
gabachada/aS
ganad/rha
ganen/rha
garrochee/GS
girad/r
gire/GSr
glas/S
greco/SG
gustaba/nS
hediondo/MGS
herida/r
hidrocarburo/S
hil/hirap
holanda/NS
hulano/GS
humanos/r
imperdible/S
imprima/pr
imprimid/rp
imprims/rp
inescrutable/S
integrndolo/GS
jabino/S
jonjabe/GS
lacn/GS
latinajo/S
lesbiano/GS
lineamiento/aS
llave/rS
llenar/rRpED
llen/pr
llevar/fRrED
llevo/fr
logstico/GS
machorro/GS
malingre/GS
manotee/GS
marte/SGN
medial/S
mentesano/GS
mesana/rS
microscopista/S
mixto/GS
monoico/GS
mosquito/GS
mustela/S
nadar/RrDE
nado/jGrle
negundo/S
nombre/pbSnor
norma/S
ocrceo/SG
opoblsamo/S
valo/S
palpndooslo/GS
parasol/S
pasbamos/r
pasado/rShbGpo
pasando/rpho
pasarais/rho
pasar/oprh
pasaremos/r
pasare/rGShpo
pasara/ohpSr
pasarnos/ro
pasarte/rpo
pasasen/rpho
pasis/oprh
pas/orph
patentice/S
pejiguera/S
perengano/GS
ptalo/S
pintabais/hr
pintado/prSh
pintando/rph
pintarais/hr
pintara/phr
pintaremos/r
pintar/rhp
pintara/pShr
pintarraje/GS
pintsemos/r
pintasteis/r
pinten/prh
pint/prh
platanar/Sa
poltico/aGS
ponerte/koprl
ponindolo/rtSG
posicin/GS
precio/ahSr
presin/kGS
propietario/GS
puesta/tkunopargilS
pujanza/Sr
puj/irp
pulimento/S
puso/ouagpltrknb
quimerino/GS
ranacuajo/S
recordativo/GS
reintegro/S
resolutorio/GS
rgido/GS
ronzal/S
sabugal/S
sale/gSpr
sala/rp
sal/rp
saltbamos/r
saltad/rGpa
saltndonos/r
saltndote/r
saltramos/r
saltars/pr
saltarais/r
saltarse/rp
saltaste/rp
salto/rSpeaG
sana/kpsrS
sarmentoso/GS
sembrad/pr
sembrndole/GS
sevillano/SG
sintindolo/S
sol/argsfk
solsonense/S
subsiste/GS
suspenso/S
tanino/S
telesilla/S
termopar/S
tiranicidio/S
todos/r
torculado/GS
tranquilidad/kS
trecenazgo/S
tronquee/GS
unicaule/S
valioso/GS
vendimiador/GS
verta/sSfprk
viajador/GS
vidriera/rS
vistan/ajihrkp
vitoriano/GS
vive/rSGhpaf
vivo/hraqGfp
yuxtapuesto/GS
zurrapiento/GS
